Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3874
(UTC 809) Control and protection of trust property.

(UTC 809) A trustee shall take reasonable steps to take control of and protect the trust property.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 74.